Hawaii statutes.
[§249-14.1] Number plates for mopeds;
registration. [Section effective January 1, 2017.] (a) The
director of finance shall cause to be produced number plates and tags or
emblems for the registration of mopeds operated in the State.

(b) The director of finance shall number and
register the moped in the owner's name in a permanent record or book to be kept
by the director of finance for this purpose, and shall furnish the owner
thereof with a receipt showing upon its face the license number issued for the
moped. The registration of mopeds shall occur on a staggered basis as agreed
upon by the counties' director of finance. The registration fee shall be $27
per year. The director of finance shall also furnish the owner, upon the
original registration of the moped, one plate with the registration number
marked thereon. Upon the payment of a registration fee for each year, a tag or
emblem bearing a serial number and the month and year of expiration shall be
provided to the owner. Transfer of current number plates, tag, or emblem,
except as authorized by this chapter, is punishable by a fine of not more than
$50 for each offense.

(c) Upon an original registration the director
of finance shall fix, and shall charge to the owner, a fee equal to the cost of
the number plate and tag or emblem plus the administrative cost of furnishing
the plate and tag or emblem and effecting the registration. Upon the issuance
of a new series of number plates, the director of finance shall charge the
owner a fee equal to the costs of the number plate plus the administrative cost
of furnishing the plate. Upon issuing a tag or emblem, the director of finance
shall charge the owner a fee of 50 cents. The owner shall securely fasten the
number plate on the rear of the moped at a location provided by the
manufacturer or in the absence of such a location upon the bumper of the moped
and in conformance with section 291-31, in such a manner as to prevent the
plate from swinging. The number plate shall at all times be displayed entirely
unobscured and be kept reasonably clean.

(d) Upon the issuance of the tag or emblem,
the owner shall affix the tag or emblem to the top right portion of the rear
number plate. [L 2016, c 200, §1]

Note

The staggering of registration and issuance of license plates
for current registered mopeds shall be completed by December 31, 2017. L 2016,
c 200, §13.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next